Idaho, session 2025, S1102.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-3301, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3301. LEGISLATIVE INTENT AND DECLARATION. The purpose of a resi-
dential care or assisted living facility in Idaho is to provide a humane,


safe, and homelike living arrangement for adults who need some assistance
with activities of daily living and personal care but do not require the
level of care identified under section 39-1301(b), Idaho Code, other than
for short exceptional stays meaning a treatment window designed to allow a
resident to receive treatment for a short term acute episode as determined by
a licensed professional nurse.
The state will encourage the development of facilities tailored to the
needs of individual populations which that operate in integrated settings in
communities where sufficient supportive services exist to provide the res-
ident, if appropriate, an opportunity to work and be involved in recreation
and education opportunities. Employment, recreational and educational op-
portunities for people with disabilities shall be offered in the most inte-
grated setting consistent with their needs.
A residential care or assisted living facility shall be operated and
staffed by individuals who have the knowledge and experience required to
provide safe and appropriate services to all residents of the facility.
The administrator or manager of the facility shall ensure that an objec-
tive, individualized assessment to determine resident needs is conducted,
develop a comprehensive negotiated plan of care to meet those needs, deliver
appropriate services to meet resident needs, and ensure resident rights are
honored.
SECTION 2. That Section 39-3302, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3302. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Abuse" means a nonaccidental act of sexual, physical or mental
mistreatment or injury of a resident through the action or inaction of an-
other individual.
(2) "Accident" means an unexpected, unintended event that can cause a
resident injury.
(2) (3) "Accreditation" means a process of review that allows health
care organizations to meet regulatory requirements and standards estab-
lished by a recognized accreditation organization.
(3) (4) "Accreditation commission" means the commission on accredita-
tion of rehabilitation facilities (CARF), the joint commission, or another
nationally recognized accreditation organization approved by the director.
(4) (5) "Activities of daily living" means the performance of basic
self-care activities in meeting an individual's needs to sustain him in a
daily living environment.
(5) (6) "Administrator" means an individual, properly licensed by the
division of occupational and professional licenses, who is responsible for
day-to-day operation of a residential care or assisted living facility.
(7) "Administrator's designee" means a person authorized in writing to
act in the absence of the administrator for no more than thirty (30) consec-
utive days when the administrator is on vacation, has days off, is ill, or is
away for trainings or meetings. This individual shall be knowledgeable of
facility operations, the residents and their needs, emergency procedures,
the location and operation of emergency equipment, and how the administrator
can be reached in the event of an emergency.


(6) (8) "Adult" means a person who has attained the age of eighteen (18)
years.
(7) (9) "Advocate" means an authorized or designated representative of
a program or organization operating under federal or state mandate to rep-
resent the interests of mentally ill, developmentally disabled, or elderly
residents.
(8) (10) "Assessment" means the conclusion reached using uniform crite-
ria, which identifies resident strengths, weaknesses, risks and needs, to
include functional, medical and behavioral needs. The assessment criteria
shall be developed by the department and residential care or assisted living
council.
(9) (11) "Authorized provider" in this chapter means an individual who
is a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist or a physician assis-
tant.
(10) (12) "Board" means the board of health and welfare.
(11) (13) "Chemical restraint" means a medication used to control be-
havior or to restrict freedom of movement and is not a standard treatment for
the resident's condition.
(14) "Complaint" means a formal expression of dissatisfaction, discon-
tent, or unhappiness by, or on behalf of, a resident concerning the care or
conditions at the facility. This expression could be oral or in writing or by
an alternate means of communication.
(12) (15) "Core issues" means abuse, neglect, exploitation, inadequate
care, a situation in which the facility has operated for more than thirty
(30) days without a licensed administrator designated the responsibility
for the day-to-day operations of the facility, inoperable fire detection or
extinguishing systems with no fire watch in place pending the correction of
the system, and surveyors denied access to records, residents, or facili-
ties.
(16) "Deficiency" means a determination of noncompliance with any sec-
tion of this chapter.
(13) (17) "Department" means the Idaho department of health and wel-
fare.
(14) (18) "Director" means the director of the Idaho department of
health and welfare.
(19) "Exit conference" means a meeting with the facility administrator
or his designee to provide review, discussion, and written documentation of
non-core issues and to provide preliminary findings of core issues.
(15) (20) "Exploitation" means the misuse of a resident's funds, prop-
erty, resources, identity or person for profit or advantage.
(16) (21) "Facility" means a residential care or assisted living facil-
ity.
(22) "Follow-up survey" means a survey conducted to confirm the facil-
ity is in compliance and has the ability to remain in compliance.
(17) (23) "Governmental unit" means the state, any county, any city,
other political subdivision, or any department, division, board, or other
agency thereof.
(24) "Immediate jeopardy" means that immediate corrective action is re-
quired because the facility is noncompliant with health and safety require-
ments placing patients at risk of serious harm, injury, or death.


(18) (25) "Inadequate care" occurs when a facility fails to provide the
services required to meet the terms of the negotiated service agreement or
provide for room, board, activities of daily living, supervision, first aid,
assistance and monitoring of medications, emergency intervention, coordi-
nation of outside services, a safe living environment; or engages in viola-
tions of residents' rights, or takes residents who have been admitted in vi-
olation of the provisions of section 39-3307, Idaho Code engages in actions
or omissions that cause harm to a resident or create a situation likely to
result in immediate jeopardy to the health, safety, or well-being of a resi-
dent.
(19) (26) "License" means a basic permit to operate a residential care
or assisted living facility.
(20) (27) "Licensee" means the owner of a license to operate a residen-
tial care or assisted living facility under this chapter.
(21) (28) "Licensing agency" means the unit of the department of health
and welfare that conducts inspections and surveys and issues licenses based
on compliance with this chapter.
(29) "Manager" means the individual delegated by the administrator to
manage the day-to-day operations of the facility.
(22) (30) "Neglect" means failure to provide food, clothing, shelter,
or medical care necessary to sustain the life and health of a resident.
(23) (31) "Negotiated service agreement" means the agreement reached by
the resident and/or the resident's representative and the facility, based on
the assessment, physician's orders, admission records, and desires of the
resident, and which outlines services to be provided and the obligations of
the facility and the resident.
(32) "Non-core issue" means any finding of deficient practice that is
not a core issue.
(24) (33) "Personal assistance" means the provision by the staff of the
facility of one (1) or more of the following services:
(a) Assisting the resident with activities of daily living;
(b) Arranging for supportive services;
(c) Being aware of the resident's general whereabouts; and
(d) Monitoring the activities of the resident while on the premises of
the facility to ensure the resident's health, safety and well-being.
(34) "Physical restraint" means any device or physical force that re-
stricts the free movement of a portion of an individual's body, except for
the temporary treatment of a medical condition, such as the use of a cast for
a broken bone.
(25) (35) "Political subdivision" means a city or county.
(26) (36) "Resident" means an adult who lives in a residential care or
assisted living facility.
(27) (37) "Residential care or assisted living facility" means a facil-
ity or residence, however named, operated on either a profit or nonprofit
basis for the purpose of providing necessary supervision, personal assis-
tance, meals and lodging to three (3) or more adults not related to the owner.
(28) (38) "Room and board" means lodging and meals.
(29) (39) "Substantial compliance" means a facility has no core issue
deficiencies.


(30) (40) "Supervision" means administrative activity which provides
the following: protection, guidance, knowledge of the resident's general
whereabouts, and assistance with activities of daily living. The admin-
istrator or manager is responsible for providing appropriate supervision
based on each resident's negotiated service agreement or other legal re-
quirements.
(31) (41) "Supportive services" means the specific services that are
provided to the resident in the community.
SECTION 3. That Section 39-3303, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3303. PAYMENT LEVELS. (1) Clients of the department who are receiv-
ing financial aid as set out in sections 56-207, 56-208 and 56-209a, Idaho
Code, seeking placement in a residential care or assisted living facility
will be assessed by the department regarding their need for specific types
of services and supports. This assessment will determine the reimbursement
rate to the service provider.
Eligible participants must be allowed to choose the facility or ser-
vices that are appropriate to meet their medical needs and financial ability
to pay. The department shall is authorized to promulgate rules, subject to
legislative approval, outlining the payment policy and calculations for
clients of the department through negotiated rulemaking.
(2) Residents who are not clients of the department shall:
(a) Be assessed by the facility regarding their need for specific types
of services and supports. This assessment, and the individual negoti-
ated service agreement, shall determine the rate charged to the resi-
dent.
(b) Receive a full description of services provided by the facility and
associated costs upon admission, according to facility policies and
procedures. A thirty (30) day notice must be provided prior to a change
in facility billing practices or policies. When a resident's level of
care changes, a facility is entitled to charge the increased rate no
sooner than the date that notice is provided. Billing practices shall
be transparent and understandable.
(c) Be charged for the use of furnishings, equipment, supplies and ba-
sic services as agreed upon in the negotiated service agreement or as
identified in the admission agreement.
SECTION 4. That Section 39-3305, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3305. RULES. (1) The board shall have the authority is authorized
to adopt, amend, repeal and enforce such rules, subject to legislative ap-
proval, as may be necessary or proper to carry out the purpose and intent of
this chapter which are designed to protect the health, safety and individual
rights of residents in residential care or assisted living facilities. The
department shall exercise the powers and perform the duties conferred upon
it by this chapter, not inconsistent with any statute of this state. These
rules shall are authorized, subject to legislative approval, to be promul-
gated in accordance with the provisions of the Idaho administrative proce-


dure act. The department shall is authorized to, through negotiated rule-
making, promulgate rules in the following areas, subject to legislative ap-
proval:
(a) Minimum criteria for the assessment;
(b) Minimum criteria for the negotiated service agreement;
(c) Guidelines for the facility's physical environment and location;
(d) Criteria for the facility's license, to include:
(i) Initial license application criteria and procedures;
(ii) License renewal criteria, procedures and timing;
(iii) Inspection criteria and procedures;
(iv) Denial and revocation of license criteria and procedures;
and
(v) Effect of previous revocation or denial of license.
(e) Remedy and enforcement provisions for noncompliance with statute.
(2) Rules shall are authorized to be drafted and promulgated, subject
to legislative approval, following negotiation with interested providers,
assisted living nurse associations, and advocates.
SECTION 5. That Section 39-3307, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3307. ADMISSIONS. (1) A residential care or assisted living facil-
ity shall not admit or retain any resident requiring a level of services or
type of service for which the facility is not licensed or which the facility
does not provide or arrange for, or if the facility does not have the staff,
appropriate in numbers and with appropriate skills, to provide. Prospective
residents will also be informed of options and rights available through
other programs, to include medicare benefits where applicable. The depart-
ment shall provide forms for this.
(2) The department shall is authorized to develop rules, subject to
legislative approval, governing admissions to residential care or assisted
living facilities.
SECTION 6. That Section 39-3308, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3308. ASSESSMENT. (1) Initial assessments may be completed within
thirty (30) days prior to a resident's move into a residential care or as-
sisted living facility, but must be completed prior to admission.
(2) The department shall employ uniform assessment criteria to assess
function and cognitive disability. The conclusions shall be deemed the as-
sessment and shall be used to provide appropriate placement and funding for
service needs. The assessment shall also be used to ensure funding is cost-
effective and appropriate when compared to other state programs relevant to
the needs of the client being assessed. The department shall is authorized
to develop rules, subject to legislative approval, regarding:
(1) (a) Qualifications of persons making the assessments.;
(2) (b) Department's responsibility for state pay clients.;
(3) Time frames for completing an assessment.
(4) (c) Information to be included in an assessment.;


(5) (d) Use of an assessment in developing the negotiated service
agreement.;
(6) (e) Use of assessments in determining facility staffing ratios.;
and
(7) (f) Use of assessments for determining the ability of provider and
facility to meet residents' needs and special training or licenses that
may be required in caring for certain residents.
(3) The administrator shall ensure policies and procedures are devel-
oped and implemented to ensure nursing services are performed in accordance
with applicable state regulations and the provisions of this chapter.
(4)(a) A licensed nurse shall visit the facility at least once every
ninety (90) days to conduct quarterly nursing assessments for each res-
ident. A licensed nurse is responsible for delegating to others as ap-
propriate based on the nurse's license.
(b) The licensed nurse shall be available to address changes in a resi-
dent's health or mental status, to review and implement new orders, and
to notify a physician or authorized provider when a resident repeatedly
refuses to follow physician orders.
SECTION 7. That Section 39-3309, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3309. NEGOTIATED SERVICE AGREEMENT. (1) Each resident shall be
provided a negotiated service agreement to provide for coordination of ser-
vices and for guidance of the staff and management of the facility where the
person resides. Upon completion, the agreement shall clearly identify the
resident and describe the services to be provided to the resident and how
such services are to be delivered. The negotiated service agreement shall
be reviewed at least annually and upon any change in a diagnosis for the res-
ident or other condition requiring substantially different additional or
replacement services.
(2) A negotiated service agreement shall be based on the person's:
(a) Assessment;
(b) Service needs for activities of daily living;
(c) Need for limited nursing services;
(d) Need for medication assistance;
(e) Frequency of needed services;
(f) Level of assistance, i.e., standby, reminding, total;
(g) Signature and approval of agreement; and
(h) Signing date that the plan was approved and date plan will be re-
viewed.
(3) The administrator or manager shall consult the resident, or the
resident's family, guardian, representative, friends, or case manager
and/or consumer coordinator, as necessary, in the development of the resi-
dent's service agreement.
(4) A copy of the agreement shall be given to the resident and a copy
placed in the resident's records file no later than two (2) weeks from admis-
sion.
(5) A resident shall be given the choice and control of how and what ser-
vices the facility shall provide, or external vendors shall provide, to the


extent the resident can make choices, so long as the resident's choice does
not violate the provisions of section 39-3307(1), Idaho Code.
(6) On an exception basis, a record shall be made of any changes or in-
ability to provide services outlined in the negotiated service agreement.
(7) The agreement shall include a statement regarding when there is no a
need for access to external services.
(8) There shall be documentation of refusal of certain treatments by
competent resident or legal health care representative.
SECTION 8. That Section 39-3316, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3316. RESIDENT RIGHTS. A The administrator of a residential care or
assisted living facility must ensure that policies and procedures are devel-
oped and implemented that protect and promote the rights of each resident,
including each of the following rights:
(1) Resident records. Upon request, a resident or others authorized
by law shall be provided immediate access to information on the resident's
record and shall be provided with copies of such information within two (2)
business days. Each facility must maintain and keep current a record of the
following information on each resident:
(a) A copy of the resident's current negotiated service agreement and
physician's order.
(b) Written acknowledgment that the resident has received copies of the
rights.
(c) A record of all personal property and funds that the resident has
entrusted to the facility, including copies of receipts for the prop-
erty.
(d) Information about any specific health problems of the resident that
may be useful in a medical emergency.
(e) The name, address and telephone number of an individual identified
by the resident who should be contacted in the event of an emergency or
death of the resident.
(f) Any other health-related, emergency, or pertinent information the
resident requests the facility to keep on record.
(g) The current admission agreement between the resident and the facil-
ity.
(2) Privacy. Each resident must be assured the right to privacy with
regard to accommodations, medical and other treatment, written and tele-
phone communications, visits, and meetings of family and resident groups.
(3) Humane care and environment, (dignity, and respect).
(a) Each resident shall have the right to humane care and a humane envi-
ronment, including the following:
(i) The right to a diet consistent with any religious or health-
related restrictions.
(ii) The right to refuse a restricted diet.
(iii) The right to a safe and sanitary living environment.
(b) Each resident shall have the right to be treated with dignity and
respect, including:
(i) The right to be treated in a courteous manner by staff.


(ii) The right to receive a response from the facility to any re-
quest of the resident within a reasonable time.
(iii) The right to be communicated with, orally and/or in writing,
in a language the resident understands.
(4) Personal possessions. Each resident shall have the right to:
(a) Wear his own clothing.
(b) Determine his own dress or hair style.
(c) Retain and use his own personal property in his own living area so as
to maintain individuality and personal dignity.
(d) Be provided a separate storage area in his own living area and at
least one (1) locked cabinet or drawer for keeping personal property.
(5) Personal funds. Residents whose board and care is paid for by pub-
lic assistance shall retain, for their personal use, the difference between
their total income and the applicable board and care rent, utilities, and
food allowance established by department rules.
(a) A facility shall not require a resident to deposit his personal
funds with the facility.
(b) Once the facility accepts the written authorization of the resi-
dent, it must hold, safeguard, and account for such personal funds under
a system established and maintained by the facility in accordance with
this paragraph.
(6) Management of personal funds. Upon a facility's acceptance of
written authorization of a resident, the facility must manage and account
for the personal funds of the resident deposited with the facility as fol-
lows:
(a) The facility must deposit any amount of a resident's personal funds
in excess of five (5) times the personal needs allowance in an interest-
bearing account (or accounts) that is separate from any of the facil-
ity's operating accounts and credit all interest earned on such sepa-
rate account to such account. The facility must maintain any other per-
sonal funds in a noninterest-bearing account or petty cash fund.
(b) The facility must assure a full and complete separate accounting of
each resident's personal funds, maintain a written record of all finan-
cial transactions involving each resident's personal funds deposited
with the facility, and afford each resident (or a legal representative
of each resident) reasonable access to such record.
(c) Upon the death of a resident with such an account, the facility must
promptly convey the resident's personal funds (and a final accounting
of such funds) to the individual administering the resident's estate.
For clients of the department, the remaining balance of funds shall be
refunded to the department medicaid estate recovery unit.
(7) Access and visitation rights. Each facility must permit:
(a) Immediate in-person access to any resident by any representative of
the department, by the state ombudsman for the elderly or his designees,
or by the resident's individual physician.
(b) Immediate in-person access to a resident, subject to the resident's
right to deny or withdraw consent at any time, by immediate family or
other relatives.


(c) Immediate access to a resident, subject to reasonable restrictions
and the resident's right to deny or withdraw consent at any time, by oth-
ers who are visiting with the consent of the resident.
(d) Reasonable access to a resident by any entity or individual that
provides health, social, legal, or other services to the resident, sub-
ject to the resident's right to deny or withdraw consent at any time.
(8) Employment. Each resident shall have the right to refuse to per-
form services for the facility except as contracted for by the resident and
the administrator of the facility. If the resident is hired by the facility
to perform services as an employee of the facility, the wage paid to the resi-
dent shall be consistent with state and federal law.
(9) Confidentiality. Each resident shall have the right to confiden-
tiality of personal and clinical records.
(10) Freedom from abuse, neglect, and restraints. Each resident shall
have the right to be free from physical, mental, or sexual abuse, neglect,
corporal punishment, involuntary seclusion, and any physical or chemical
restraints. The use of supportive devices with restraining qualities is
permissible if the following conditions are met:
(a) For residents with the cognitive ability to consent, the facility
shall document the following:
(i) The resident specifically requests or approves of the device
and a licensed health care professional has informed the individ-
ual of the risks and benefits associated with the device;
(ii) A facility nurse acting within the nurse's scope of license
has conducted a thorough assessment;
(iii) The facility has documented other less restrictive alterna-
tives evaluated prior to the use of the device and obtained written
consent from the patient or representative; and
(iv) The facility has instructed direct care staff on the correct
use and precautions related to the device.
(b) Supportive devices with restraining qualities are permissible for
residents who are unable to evaluate the risks and benefits of the de-
vice when the conditions contained in paragraph (a)(ii) through (iv)
of this subsection are present and documented by the facility. The
facility shall also obtain and document the consent of the resident's
guardian, representative, or power of attorney as applicable.
(c) Documentation of the use of supportive devices with restraining
qualities shall be included in the resident's service plan and evalu-
ated on a quarterly basis.
(11) Freedom of religion. Each resident shall have the right to prac-
tice the religion of his choice or to abstain from religious practice. Res-
idents shall also be free from the imposition of the religious practices of
others.
(12) Control and receipt of health-related services. Each resident
shall have the right to control his receipt of health-related services, in-
cluding:
(a) The right to retain the services of his own personal physician, den-
tist and other health care professionals.
(b) The right to select the pharmacy or pharmacist of his choice so long
as it meets the statute and rules governing residential care or assisted


living and the policies and procedures of the residential care or as-
sisted living facility.
(c) The right to confidentiality and privacy concerning his medical or
dental condition and treatment.
(d) The right to refuse medical services based on informed decision-
making. Refusal of treatment does not relieve the facility of its obli-
gations under this chapter.
(i) The facility shall document that the resident and the res-
ident's legal guardian have been informed of the consequences of
the refusal; and
(ii) The facility shall document that the resident's physician or
authorized provider has been notified of the resident's refusal.
(13) Grievances. Each resident shall have the right to voice grievances
with respect to treatment or care that is (or fails to be) furnished with-
out discrimination or reprisal for voicing the grievances and the right to
prompt efforts by the facility to resolve grievances the resident may have,
including those with respect to the behavior of other residents.
(14) Participation in resident and family groups. Each resident shall
have the right to organize and participate in resident groups in the facility
and the right of the resident's family to meet in the facility with the fami-
lies of other residents in the facility.
(15) Participation in other activities. Each resident shall have the
right to participate in social, religious, and community activities that do
not interfere with the rights of other residents in the facility.
(16) Examination of survey results. Each resident shall have the right
to examine, upon reasonable request, the results of the most recent survey of
the facility conducted by the department with respect to the facility and any
plan of correction in effect with respect to the facility.
(17) Access by advocates and representatives. A residential care or as-
sisted living facility shall permit advocates and representatives of commu-
nity legal services programs, whose purposes include rendering assistance
without charge to residents, to have access to the facility at reasonable
times in order to:.
(a) Visit, talk with, and make personal, social and legal services
available to all residents.
(b) Inform residents of their rights and entitlements, and their cor-
responding obligations, under state, federal and local laws by distri-
bution of educational materials and discussion in groups and with indi-
viduals.
(c) Assist residents in asserting their legal rights regarding claims
for public assistance, medical assistance and social security benefits
and in all other matters in which residents are aggrieved, which may
be provided individually or in a group basis and may include organiza-
tional activity, counseling and litigation.
(d) Engage in all other methods of assisting, advising and representing
residents so as to extend to them the full enjoyment of their rights.
(e) Communicate privately and without restrictions with any resident
who consents to the communication.
(f) Observe all common areas of the facility.


(18) Access by protection and advocacy system. A residential care or
assisted living facility shall permit advocates and representatives of the
protection and advocacy system, designated by the governor pursuant to 42
U.S.C. 15043 and 10801 et seq., access to residents, facilities and records
in accordance with applicable federal statutes and regulations.
(19) Access by the long-term care ombudsman. A residential care or
assisted living facility shall permit advocates and representatives of
the long-term care ombudsman program, pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 3058, section
67-5009, Idaho Code, and IDAPA 15.01.03, rules of the commission on aging,
access to residents, facilities and records in accordance with applicable
federal and state law, rules and regulations.
(20) A facility may not require precautions, such as health screenings,
for in-person visitors that are more stringent than precautions for facil-
ity staff, and in-person access pursuant to subsection (7)(a) and (b) of this
section shall not be precluded on the basis of a visitor's vaccination sta-
tus.
(21) Each resident shall have the right to be transferred or discharged
only for medical reasons, for the resident's welfare or the welfare of other
residents, or for nonpayment of the resident's stay. In non-emergency con-
ditions, the resident shall be given at least thirty (30) calendar days no-
tice of discharge. A resident has the right to appeal any involuntary dis-
charge.
SECTION 9. That Chapter 33, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-3316A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-3316A. NOTICE OF RESIDENTS' RIGHTS. Each facility shall:
(1) Inform each resident, orally and in writing, at the time of admis-
sion to the facility of the resident's legal rights during the stay at the fa-
cility;
(2) Make available to each resident, upon reasonable request, a written
statement of such rights, and notify a resident when such rights change;
(3) Ensure the written statement of legal rights includes a description
of the protection of personal funds and a statement that a resident may file a
complaint with the department regarding resident abuse, neglect, and misap-
propriation of resident property in the facility at any time; and
(4) Conspicuously post the residents' rights in the facility at all
times.
SECTION 10. That Section 39-3318, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3318. FACILITY RESPONSE TO INCIDENTS AND COMPLAINTS. (1) In addi-
tion to any other requirements of this chapter, the residential care or as-
sisted living facility shall provide a procedure approved by the licensing
agency for immediate response to incidents and complaints. This procedure
shall include a method of assuring that the administrator or designee has
personally investigated the matter, and that the person making the complaint
or reporting the incident has received a response of action taken or a rea-
son why no action needs to be taken. In the case of anonymous complaints, the


administrator or designee shall document the action taken or a reason why no
action needs to be taken have a process in place to address incidents and com-
plaints.
(2) In order to assure the opportunity for complaints from the resi-
dents, the neighborhood, and the community to be made directly to the ad-
ministrator or designee, each facility shall, within a reasonable period of
time, meet with a complainant.
SECTION 11. That Section 39-3321, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3321. QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS OF ADMINISTRATOR. (1) Each
residential care or assisted living facility must employ at least one (1) ad-
ministrator licensed by the division of occupational and professional li-
censes, which is responsible for licensing residential care facility admin-
istrators for the state of Idaho. Multiple Up to three (3) multiple facili-
ties under one (1) administrator may will be allowed by the department based
on an approved plan of operation.
(2) The administrator or the administrator's designee is responsible
for:
(a) Ensuring that policies and procedures are developed and imple-
mented to comply with this chapter;
(b) Ensuring that adult protective services and law enforcement are no-
tified when required pursuant to sections 39-5303 and 39-5310, Idaho
Code;
(c) Ensuring that facility procedures for investigation of complaints,
incidents, accidents, and allegations of abuse, neglect, or exploita-
tion are implemented to ensure resident safety;
(d) Identifying and monitoring patterns of accidents, incidents, or
complaints and developing interventions to prevent recurrences;
(e) Completing an investigation and written report of the findings
within thirty (30) calendar days for each accident, incident, com-
plaint, or allegation of abuse, neglect, or exploitation;
(f) Being reachable and available at all times; and
(g) Ensuring that no personnel providing hands-on care or supervision
services is under seventeen (17) years of age, unless such personnel
have completed a certified nursing assistant certification course.
(3) The administrator or the administrator's designee must be notified
of all serious incidents, accidents, or allegations of abuse, neglect, or
exploitation immediately and notified of complaints regarding health and
safety issues within one (1) business day.
(4) When abuse, neglect, exploitation, incidents, or accidents occur,
corrective action shall be immediately taken and monitored to ensure the
problem does not recur.
(5) When a reportable incident occurs, the administrator or adminis-
trator's designee shall notify the licensing agency within one (1) business
day of the incident.
(6) The facility shall notify the licensing agency, in writing, within
three (3) business days of a change of administrator.


SECTION 12. That Section 39-3322, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3322. QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR FACILITY STAFF. (1) Each
facility must employ or arrange for sufficient trained staff to fully meet
the needs of its residents and the requirements of this chapter. The facil-
ity shall have sufficient staff to provide care during all hours required in
each resident's negotiated service plan. Additional staff may be required
if physical plant and disability of residents indicate that staff assistance
in emergencies is required. Benchmarks shall be established in the assess-
ment criteria where the need for certified nursing assistants or licensed
nurses is indicated. Residential care or assisted living facilities shall
not retain residents who require the care provided by nursing facilities un-
der section 39-1301(b), Idaho Code, other than for short exceptional stays
pursuant to negotiated rulemaking as defined in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho
Code.
(2) Should a residential care or assisted living facility choose not
to carry professional liability insurance, that information shall be dis-
closed, in writing, to employees at the time of hiring.
SECTION 13. That Section 39-3326, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3326. MEDICATIONS. The medication policy governed by the policy
and procedure of the facility shall include a policy permitting, under the
conditions specified, a licensed nurse to fill individual dose systems such
as blister pack, mediset, or other system approved by the department and
label with the name, dosage, amount, time to be taken, and special instruc-
tions if appropriate. The policy shall provide for appropriate records to
maintain security of medications received from a pharmacist in accordance
with pharmacy standards. The licensed nurse shall appropriately label the
medication with name, dosage, amount and time to be taken, and special in-
structions if appropriate. Facilities may choose to use bulk containers for
over-the-counter medications.
SECTION 14. That Section 39-3340, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3340. LICENSING. (1) Any person, firm, partnership, association,
governmental unit, or corporation within the state proposing to operate, es-
tablish, manage, conduct, or maintain a residential care or assisted living
facility in the state shall have a license issued by the licensing agency of
the department. A license is not transferable. The owner of the license has
ultimate responsibility for the operation of the facility.
(2) Each residential care or assisted living facility in the state re-
quires an administrator, properly licensed by the division of occupational
and professional licenses, who is responsible for the day-to-day operation
of the facility. The licensed administrator may perform the day-to-day
responsibilities at the facility or may delegate all day-to-day responsi-
bilities to a facility manager. A licensed administrator may serve up to


three (3) multiple facilities and delegate all day-to-day responsibilities
to on-site managers.
(3) A license is not transferable from one (1) individual to another,
from one (1) business entity to another, or from one (1) location to another.
When a change of operator, ownership or location occurs, the facility shall
be relicensed, and the operator shall follow the application procedures and
obtain a license before commencing operation as a facility. When there is
a significant change in an owner's share of the facility that does not al-
ter the overall ownership or operation of the business, that change shall be
communicated to the licensing agency within sixty (60) days of the effective
date of the change. When the owner contracts the operation to a facility man-
agement company, other than for temporary management, it shall be treated as
a change of operator.
(3) All facilities must be licensed by the department.
(a) Change of building ownership, new construction, or buildings being
converted to a facility shall be licensed, and the operator shall follow
the application procedures and obtain a license before commencing oper-
ation as a facility.
(b) When there is a change of operator or lessee in currently licensed
buildings, the operator or lessee shall follow the licensing process
for currently licensed buildings. Facilities shall submit requested
licensing documents to the department. Any company or individual es-
tablished in the state of Idaho with at least one (1) operating facility
shall not be required to submit an updated copy of policies and pro-
cedures. The licensing process shall not require a fire life safety
inspection prior to license issuance. Within one hundred eighty (180)
days of license issuance fire life safety shall inspect and provide rec-
ommendations, if any, to the new operator or lessee.
(c) Any minor change of ownership of existing buildings shall be commu-
nicated to the department within sixty (60) days of the change.
(d) Exceptions to the provisions of this section may be made by the de-
partment for temporary management.
SECTION 15. That Section 39-3351, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3351. EXEMPTIONS. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to
any of the following:
(1) Any health facility as defined by chapter 13, title 39, Idaho Code.;
(2) Any house, institution, hotel, congregate housing project, retire-
ment home or other similar place that is limited to providing one (1) or more
of the following: housing, meals, transportation, housekeeping, or recre-
ational and social activities; or that has residents accessing supportive
services from an entity approved to provide such services in Idaho and hold-
ing no legal ownership interest in the entity operating the facility.; or
(3) Any arrangement for the receiving and care of persons by a relative.
(4) Any similar facility determined by the director.
SECTION 16. That Section 39-3352, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


39-3352. UNLICENSED RESIDENTIAL CARE OR ASSISTED LIVING FACILI-
TIES. (1) No unlicensed residential care or assisted living facility shall
operate in this state.
(2) A facility shall be deemed to be an "unlicensed residential care or
assisted living facility" and "maintained and operated to provide services"
if it is unlicensed and not exempt from licensure, and any one (1) of the fol-
lowing conditions is satisfied:
(a) The facility is, or is held out as or represented as, providing
care, supervision and services.
(b) The facility accepts or retains residents who demonstrate the need
for care, supervision, and services, as defined in this chapter or the
rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.
(3) Upon discovery of an unlicensed residential care or assisted living
facility, the department shall refer residents to the appropriate placement
or adult protective services agency if either of the following conditions
exist:
(a) There is an immediate threat to the resident's health and safety.
(b) The facility will not cooperate with the licensing agency to apply
for a license, meet licensing standards, and obtain a valid license.
(4) A person found to be operating a residential care or assisted living
facility without a license shall may be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six (6) months, or by a fine not to
exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(5) In the event the county attorney in the county where the alleged vi-
olation occurred fails or refuses to act within thirty (30) days of notifica-
tion of the violation, the attorney general is authorized to prosecute vio-
lations under the provisions of this section.
SECTION 17. That Section 39-3354A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 18. That Chapter 33, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-3355A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-3355A. INSPECTIONS. (1) The licensing agency shall cause to be made
such inspections and investigations to determine compliance with this chap-
ter and applicable rules.
(2) Initial inspections, licensure or re-licensure inspections, fol-
low-up inspections, and fire life safety inspections shall be scheduled in
advance, with facilities receiving notice at least thirty (30) days prior to
the inspection date.
(3) Initial surveys shall be conducted within ninety (90) days of li-
censure, followed by a licensure survey within fifteen (15) months.
(4) Complaint investigation surveys shall occur based on the potential
severity of the complaint and shall be made unannounced and without prior no-
tice.
(5) The department may accept the services of any qualified person or
organization, either public or private, to examine, survey, or inspect any
entity requesting or holding a facility license, including as described in
subsection (13) of this section.


(6) An inspector shall have full access and authority to examine, among
other things, quality of care and service delivery, a facility's records,
resident accounts, and physical premises, including buildings, grounds and
equipment, and any other areas necessary to determine compliance with this
chapter and applicable rules.
(7) An inspector shall have authority to interview the licensee, admin-
istrator, staff, and residents. Interviews with residents shall be confi-
dential and conducted privately unless otherwise specified by the resident.
(8) The licensing agency shall notify the facility, in writing, of all
deficiencies, provide a proposed plan of correction for all deficiencies,
and approve a reasonable length of time for compliance by the facility. At
the time of the exit conference, the licensing agency shall provide the fa-
cility a written report specifying the non-core issue deficiencies. Facil-
ities are not required to submit plans of correction for non-core deficien-
cies.
(9) When core issues are identified during a survey, the licensing
agency shall provide a written report within ten (10) business days of the
exit conference or the last day of receipt of additional material. Fa-
cilities may either adopt the proposed plan of correction or submit an
alternative plan of correction for approval by the department for core issue
deficiencies.
(10) If any deficiencies constitute an immediate jeopardy, the depart-
ment shall require immediate correction of deficient practice.
(11) Current lists of deficiencies, including plans of correction,
shall be available to the public upon request in the individual facilities or
by written request to the department.
(12) The licensing agency shall conduct follow-up surveys to ascertain
corrections to issues are made according to the time frames established in
the plan of correction for core issues. If the department identifies re-
peat deficient facility practices during any follow-up survey, the depart-
ment may initiate or extend enforcement actions.
(13) The department shall accept an accreditation survey from an ac-
creditation commission for a residential care or assisted living facility
instead of regular compliance inspections conducted under the authority of
this section if all of the following conditions are met:
(a) The accreditation commission's standards meet or exceed the state
requirements for licensure for residential care or assisted living fa-
cilities;
(b) The facility submits to the department a copy of its required ac-
creditation reports to the accreditation commission in addition to the
application and any other information required for renewal of a li-
cense;
(c) The inspection results are available for public inspection to the
same extent that the results of an investigation or inspection con-
ducted under this section are available for public inspection;
(d) The accreditation commission complies with the health insurance
portability and accountability act and takes reasonable precautions
to protect the confidentiality of personally identifiable information
concerning the residents of the facility; and


(e) If the facility's accreditation report is not valid for the entire
licensure period, the department may conduct a compliance inspection of
the facility during the time period for which the department does not
have a valid accreditation report.
(14) The department shall establish a self-inspection program for fa-
cilities that receive a gold or silver rating, defined as high ratings with
no significant deficiencies on the most recent inspection. Qualifying
facilities shall conduct self-inspections for complaints received by the
department that do not involve health or safety concerns. Facilities shall
submit findings and corrective actions to the department. The department
retains the authority to conduct verification inspections for complaints
involving health or safety concerns or incomplete reports.
(15) The department shall not conduct an on-site compliance inspec-
tion of the residential care or assisted living facility during the time
the accreditation report is valid except for complaint surveys or in cases
of emergencies. Accreditation does not limit the department in performing
any power or duty under this chapter or inspection authorized under this
section, including taking appropriate action relating to a residential
care or assisted living facility, such as suspending or revoking a license,
investigating an allegation of abuse, exploitation, or neglect or another
complaint, or assessing an administrative penalty.
SECTION 19. That Chapter 33, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-3355B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-3355B. PLAN OF CORRECTION FOR CORE ISSUES. (1) The facility shall
either accept the proposed plan of correction for core issues or develop
and submit an acceptable plan of correction to the licensing agency within
ten (10) business days of receipt of the written report of identified core
issues. If an acceptable plan of correction is not submitted within the
required time frame, the department may initiate or extend enforcement ac-
tions.
(2) An acceptable plan of correction shall include:
(a) A plan to ensure correction of each deficient practice and ongoing
compliance;
(b) A description of how, and at what frequency, corrective actions
will be monitored to ensure that each deficient practice is corrected
and will not recur, such as what program will be put into place to moni-
tor the continued effectiveness of the systemic change; and
(c) The completion date for correcting each deficiency. No correction
date may be more than forty-five (45) days from the exit date printed
on the written report except in unusual circumstances and only with the
written approval of the licensing agency.
SECTION 20. That Section 39-3356, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3356. COMPLAINTS. (1) A person who believes that any provision
of this chapter has been violated may file a complaint with the licensing
agency.


(2) The licensing agency shall investigate, or cause to be investi-
gated, any complaint alleging a violation of this chapter or applicable
rules, regulations and standards. If the licensing agency reasonably be-
lieves a requirement of this chapter has been violated, it shall conduct an
inspection of the facility unannounced, unscheduled, and without written
notice.
(3) A complaint filed with the licensing agency which is subsequently
released to the facility that is the subject of the complaint or to any member
of the public shall not disclose the name or identifying characteristics of
the complainant unless:
(a) The complainant consents in writing to the disclosure.
(b) The investigation results in a judicial proceeding and disclosure
is ordered by the court.
(c) If the disclosure is essential to the investigation, the com-
plainant shall be given an opportunity to withdraw the complaint before
disclosure.
(4) The licensing agency shall inform the complainant or, if requested
by the complainant, the complainant's designated representative, of the re-
sults of the investigation and any action taken by the agency.
(5) Complaints shall not be listed on the department's public website.
Substantiated complaints that result in a citation may be included in the in-
spection results on the department's public website.
SECTION 21. That Section 39-3357, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3357. ENFORCEMENT PROCESS. (1) If the licensing agency finds, on
the basis of inspections as defined in this chapter or otherwise, that a res-
idential or assisted living facility no longer meets a requirement of this
chapter, and further finds that the facility's deficiencies:
(a) Immediately jeopardize the health or safety of its residents,
the department shall take immediate action to remove the jeopardy
and correct the deficiencies through the remedy specified in section
39-3358(1)(c), Idaho Code, or prohibit the facility from keeping or
admitting residents and may provide, in addition, for one (1) or more of
the other remedies described in section 39-3358, Idaho Code.
(b) Do not immediately jeopardize the health or safety of its resi-
dents, the department shall provide for one (1) or more of the remedies
described in section 39-3358, Idaho Code.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as restricting the reme-
dies available to the department to remedy a facility's deficiencies. If
the department finds that a facility meets the requirements of this chap-
ter, but, as of a previous period, intentionally did not meet such require-
ments, the department may provide for a civil money penalty under section
39-3358(1)(b), Idaho Code, for the days in which it finds that the facility
was not in compliance with such requirements.
(3) Residential care or assisted living facilities may be cited only
for a violation of a requirement that is specified in an applicable law or
in a rule promulgated in compliance with an applicable law. Facilities may
not be cited for an act that is not expressly proscribed by an applicable law
or rule or for an omission when an applicable law or rule does not expressly


require the conduct omitted. If the department requires a specific correc-
tive action in relation to a citation, that requirement must be in writing
and reference the corresponding rule.
(4) If a civil money penalty is assessed against a facility for defi-
ciencies that do not require relocation of residents or facility closure,
the facility may use funds equal to the penalty amount to correct the defi-
ciencies instead of paying the penalty. Documentation of expenditures ad-
dressing the deficiencies must be submitted to the department.
(5) Funds collected from such penalties, including those held by the
department on July 1, 2025, or collected after such date, may be used by fa-
cilities through a department-administered grant program to improve resi-
dent care and quality of life. The department shall establish guidelines and
a process for grant applications and fund distribution.
SECTION 22. That Section 63-701, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-701. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Claimant" means a person who has filed an application under sec-
tion 63-602G, Idaho Code, and has filed a claim under the provisions of
sections 63-701 through 63-710, Idaho Code. Except as provided in section
63-702(2), Idaho Code, on January 1 or before April 15 of the year in which
the claimant first filed a claim on the homestead in question, a claimant
must be an owner of the homestead, a claimant must have lawful presence in the
United States pursuant to section 67-7903, Idaho Code, and on January 1 of
said year a claimant must be:
(a) Not less than sixty-five (65) years old; or
(b) A child under the age of eighteen (18) years who is fatherless or
motherless or who has been abandoned by any surviving parent or parents;
or
(c) A widow or widower; or
(d) A disabled person who is recognized as disabled by the social se-
curity administration pursuant to title 42 of the United States Code,
or by the railroad retirement board pursuant to title 45 of the United
States Code, or by the office of management and budget pursuant to title
5 of the United States Code, or, if a person is not within the purview of,
and is therefore not recognized as disabled by, any other entity listed
in this paragraph, then by the public employee retirement system or pub-
lic employee disability plan in which the person participates that may
be of any state, local unit of government or other jurisdiction in the
United States of America; or
(e) A disabled veteran of any war engaged in by the United States, whose
disability is recognized as a service-connected disability of a degree
of ten percent (10%) or more, or who has a pension for nonservice-con-
nected disabilities, in accordance with laws and regulations adminis-
tered by the United States department of veterans affairs; or
(f) A person, as specified in 42 U.S.C. 1701, who was or is entitled
to receive benefits because he is known to have been taken by a hostile
force as a prisoner, hostage or otherwise; or
(g) Blind.


(2) "Homestead" means the dwelling, owner-occupied by the claimant
as described in this chapter and used as the primary dwelling place of the
claimant and may be occupied by any members of the household as their home,
and so much of the land surrounding it, not exceeding one (1) acre, as is
reasonably necessary for the use of the dwelling as a home. It may consist
of a part of a multidwelling or multipurpose building and part of the land
upon which it is built. "Homestead" does not include personal property such
as furniture, furnishings or appliances, but a manufactured home may be a
homestead.
(3) "Household" means the claimant and the claimant's spouse. The term
does not include bona fide lessees, tenants, or roomers and boarders on con-
tract. "Household" includes persons described in subsection (8)(b) of this
section.
(4) "Household income" means all income received by the claimant and,
if married, all income received by the claimant's spouse, in a calendar year.
(5) "Income" means the sum of federal adjusted gross income as defined
in the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in section 63-3004, Idaho Code, and
to the extent not already included in federal adjusted gross income:
(a) Alimony;
(b) Support money;
(c) Nontaxable strike benefits;
(d) The nontaxable amount of any individual retirement account, pen-
sion or annuity, including railroad retirement benefits, all payments
received under the federal social security act except the social secu-
rity death benefit as specified in this subsection, state unemployment
insurance laws, and veterans disability pensions and compensation, ex-
cluding any return of principal paid by the recipient of an annuity and
excluding rollovers as provided in 26 U.S.C. 402 or 403, and excluding
the nontaxable portion of a Roth individual retirement account distri-
bution, as provided in 26 U.S.C. 408A;
(e) Nontaxable interest received from the federal government or any of
its instrumentalities or a state government or any of its instrumental-
ities;
(f) Worker's compensation; and
(g) The gross amount of loss of earnings insurance.
It does not include gifts from nongovernmental sources or inheritances. To
the extent not reimbursed, the cost of medical care as defined in section
213(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, incurred and paid by the claimant and,
if married, the claimant's spouse, may be deducted from income. To the ex-
tent not reimbursed, personal funeral expenses, including prepaid funeral
expenses and premiums on funeral insurance, of the claimant and claimant's
spouse only, may be deducted from income up to an annual maximum of five
thousand dollars ($5,000) per claim. "Income" does not include veterans
disability pensions received by a person described in subsection (1)(e)
of this section who is a claimant or a claimant's spouse if the disability
pension is received pursuant to a service-connected disability of a de-
gree of forty percent (40%) or more. "Income" does not include dependency
and indemnity compensation or death benefits paid to a person described in
subsection (1) of this section by the United States department of veterans
affairs and arising from a service-connected death or disability. "Income"


does not include lump sum death benefits made by the social security admin-
istration pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 402(i). Documentation of medical expenses
may be required by the county assessor and state tax commission in such form
as the county assessor or state tax commission shall determine. For pur-
poses of this chapter only and in the case of a claimant who owns and whose
homestead is a certified family home as defined in section 39-3502, Idaho
Code, "income" does not include payments that the claimant received as an
enrolled medicaid provider from the medical assistance program. "Income"
shall be that received in the calendar year immediately preceding the year
in which a claim is filed. Where a claimant and/or the claimant's spouse
does not file a federal tax return, the claimant's and/or the claimant's
spouse's federal adjusted gross income, for purposes of this section, shall
be an income equivalent to federal adjusted gross income had the claimant
and/or the claimant's spouse filed a federal tax return, as determined by the
county assessor. The county assessor or state tax commission may require
documentation of income in such form as each shall determine, including, but
not limited to: copies of federal or state tax returns and any attachments
thereto; and income reporting forms such as the W-2 and 1099.
For determining income for certain married individuals living apart,
the provisions of sections 2(c) and 7703(b) of the Internal Revenue Code
shall apply.
(6) "Occupied" means actual use and possession.
(7) "Owner" means a person holding title in fee simple or holding a cer-
tificate of motor vehicle title (either of which may be subject to mortgage,
deed of trust or other lien) or who has retained or been granted a life estate
or who is a person entitled to file a claim under section 63-702, Idaho Code.
"Owner" shall also include any person who:
(a) Is the beneficiary of a revocable or irrevocable trust which is the
owner of such homestead and under which the claimant or the claimant's
spouse has the primary right of occupancy of the homestead; or
(b) Is a partner of a limited partnership, member of a limited liabil-
ity company or shareholder of a corporation if such entity holds title
in fee simple or holds a certificate of motor vehicle title and if the
person holds at least a five percent (5%) ownership in such entity, as
determined by the county assessor; or
(c) Has retained or been granted a life estate.
"Owner" includes a vendee in possession under a land sale contract. Any
partial ownership shall be considered as ownership for determining initial
qualification for property tax reduction benefits; however, the amount of
property tax reduction under section 63-704, Idaho Code, and rules promul-
gated pursuant to section 63-705, Idaho Code, shall be computed on the value
of the claimant's partial ownership. "Partial ownership," for the purposes
of this section, means any one (1) person's ownership when property is owned
by more than one (1) person or where the homestead is held by an entity, as
set forth in this subsection, but more than one (1) person has the right of
occupancy of such homestead. A person holding either partial title in fee
simple or holding a certificate of motor vehicle title together with another
person, but who does not occupy the dwelling as his primary dwelling place,
shall not be considered an owner for purposes of this section, if such person
is a cosignatory of a note secured by the dwelling in question and at least


one (1) of the other cosignatories of the note occupies the dwelling as his
primary dwelling place. The combined community property interests of both
spouses shall not be considered partial ownership as long as the combined
community property interests constitute the entire ownership of the home-
stead, including where the spouses are occupying a homestead owned by an en-
tity, as set forth in this subsection, and the spouses have the primary right
of occupancy of the homestead. The proportional reduction required under
this subsection shall not apply to community property interests. Where
title to property was held by a person who has died without timely filing a
claim for property tax reduction, the estate of the deceased person shall be
the "owner," provided that the time periods during which the deceased person
held such title shall be attributed to the estate for the computation of any
time periods under subsection (8)(a) or (b) of this section.
(8)(a) "Primary dwelling place" means the claimant's dwelling place
on January 1 or before April 15 of the year for which the claim is made.
The primary dwelling place is the single place where a claimant has
his true, fixed and permanent home and principal establishment, and to
which whenever the individual is absent he has the intention of return-
ing. A claimant must establish the dwelling to which the claim relates
to be his primary dwelling place by clear and convincing evidence or by
establishing that the dwelling is where the claimant resided on January
1 or before April 15 and:
(i) At least six (6) months during the prior year; or
(ii) The majority of the time the claimant owned the dwelling if
owned by the claimant less than one (1) year; or
(iii) The majority of the time after the claimant first occupied
the dwelling if occupied by the claimant for less than one (1)
year. The county assessor may require written or other proof of
the foregoing in such form as the county assessor may determine.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsec-
tion, the property upon which the claimant makes application shall be
deemed to be the claimant's primary dwelling place if the claimant is
otherwise qualified and resides in a care facility and does not allow
the property upon which the claimant has made application to be occu-
pied by persons paying a consideration to occupy the dwelling. Payment
of utilities shall not be payment of a consideration to occupy the
dwelling. A claimant's spouse who resides in a care facility shall be
deemed to reside at the claimant's primary dwelling place and to be a
part of the claimant's household. A care facility is a hospital, nurs-
ing facility or intermediate care facility for people with intellectual
disabilities as defined in section 39-1301, Idaho Code, or a facility
as defined in section 39-3302(16), Idaho Code, or a dwelling other than
the one upon which the applicant makes application where a claimant who
is unable to reside in the dwelling upon which the application is made
lives and receives help in daily living, protection and security.
SECTION 23. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.03.22, Idaho Department
of Health and Welfare, relating to Residential Assisted Living Facilities,
Section 001., Subsection 05.; Section 130.; Section 152., Subsection 03.b.;
Section 215.; Section 300.; Section 550.; and Section 560. shall be null,
void, and of no force and effect after July 1, 2025.


SECTION 24. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.